Illinois, session 104th, SB3888.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/2)  (from Ch. 15, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Chief fiscal officer.8    The comptroller shall serve as the chief fiscal control 9officer of the State of Illinois, shall maintain the State's 10central fiscal accounts, shall order all payments into and out 11of the funds held by the State Treasurer and, in addition to 12the powers and duties otherwise provided by law, shall have 13the powers and duties provided in this Act and the Crematory 14Regulation Act.15(Source: P.A. 77-2807.) 16    Section 10. The Crematory Regulation Act is amended by 17adding Section 7.1 as follows: 18    (410 ILCS 18/7.1 new)19    Sec. 7.1. Appointment of investigators. The State 20Comptroller shall have the power to appoint investigators to 21conduct investigations, searches, seizures, arrests, and other   SB3888- 2 -LRB104 19248 BDA 32694 b1duties required to enforce the provisions of the Crematory 2Regulation Act on behalf of the Comptroller and to ensure the 3health, safety, and welfare of this State. The Comptroller's 4investigators shall be peace officers and shall have all the 5powers possessed by police officers in cities and by sheriffs. 6Comptroller investigators may exercise these powers throughout 7the State whenever enforcing the provisions of the Crematory 8Regulation Act, subject to the rules and orders of the 9Comptroller. No Comptroller investigator may have peace 10officer status or may exercise police powers unless:11        (1) the investigator successfully completes the basic 12    police training course mandated and approved by the 13    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board; or14        (2) the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards 15    Board waives the training requirement by reason of the 16    investigator's prior law enforcement experience, training, 17    or both. 18    The Director responsible for crematory oversight and 19regulation under the Comptroller must authorize to each 20investigator of the Comptroller and to any other employee of 21the agency exercising the powers of a peace officer a distinct 22badge that, on its face:23        (1) clearly states that the badge is authorized by the 24    Comptroller; and25        (2) contains a unique identifying number.26    No other badge shall be authorized by the Comptroller.   SB3888- 3 -LRB104 19248 BDA 32694 b1Nothing in this Section prohibits the Director from issuing 2shields or other distinctive identification to employees 3performing security or regulatory duties who are not peace 4officers if the Director determines that a shield or 5distinctive identification is needed by the employee to carry 6out the Director's responsibilities.